Utah statutes.
38-1-27.   State Construction Registry -- Form and contents of notice of
commencement, preliminary notice, and notice of completion.
(1)  As used in this section, Sections 38-1-30 through 38-1-37, and Section
38-1-40:
(a)  "Alternate filing" means a legible and complete filing made in a manner
established by the division under Subsection (2)(e) other than an electronic
filing.
(b)  "Cancel" means to indicate that a filing is no longer given effect.
(c)  "Construction project," "project," or "improvement" means all labor,
equipment, and materials provided:
(i)  under an original contract; or
(ii)  by, or under contracts with, an owner-builder.
(d)  "Database" means the State Construction Registry created in this section.
(e) (i)  "Designated agent" means the third party the Division of Occupational
and Professional Licensing contracts with to create and maintain the State
Construction Registry.
(ii)  The designated agent is not an agency, instrumentality, or a political
subdivision of the state.
(f)  "Division" means the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing.
(g)  "Interested person" means a person who may be affected by a construction
project.
(h)  "Program" means the State Construction Registry Program created in this
section.
(2)  Subject to receiving adequate funding through a legislative appropriation
and contracting with an approved third party vendor who meets the requirements
of Sections 38-1-30 through 38-1-37, there is created the State Construction
Registry Program that shall:
(a) (i)  assist in protecting public health, safety, and welfare; and
(ii)  promote a fair working environment;
(b)  be overseen by the division with the assistance of the designated agent;
(c)  provide a central repository for notices of commencement, preliminary
notices, and notices of completion filed in connection with all privately
owned construction projects as well as all state and local government owned
construction projects throughout Utah;
(d)  be accessible for filing and review by way of the program Internet
website of:
(i)  notices of commencement;
(ii)  preliminary notices;
(iii)  a notice of intent to file notice of final completion;
(iv)  a notice for remaining amounts due to complete the contract; and
(v)  notices of completion;
(e)  accommodate:
(i)  electronic filing of the notices described in Subsection (2)(d); and
(ii)  alternate filing of the notices described in Subsection (2)(d) by U.S.
mail, telefax, or any other alternate method as provided by rule made by the
division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act;
(f) (i)  provide electronic notification for up to three e-mail addresses for
each interested person or company who requests notice from the construction
notice registry; and
(ii)  provide alternate means of notification for a person who makes an
alternate filing, including U.S. mail, telefax, or any other method as
prescribed by rule made by the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and
(g)  provide hard-copy printing of electronic receipts for an individual
filing evidencing the date and time of the individual filing and the content
of the individual filing.
(3) (a)  The designated agent shall provide notice of all other filings for a
project to any person who files a notice of commencement, preliminary notice,
or notice of completion for that project, unless the person:
(i)  requests that the person not receive notice of other filings; or
(ii)  does not provide the designated agent with the person's contact
information in a manner that adequately informs the designated agent.
(b)  An interested person may request notice of filings related to a project.
(c)  The database shall be indexed by:
(i)  owner name;
(ii)  original contractor name;
(iii)  subdivision, development, or other project name, if any;
(iv)  project address;
(v)  lot or parcel number;
(vi)  unique project number assigned by the designated agent; and
(vii)  any other identifier that the division considers reasonably appropriate
in collaboration with the designated agent.
(4) (a)  In accordance with the process required by Section 63J-1-504, the
division shall establish the fees for:
(i)  a notice of commencement;
(ii)  a preliminary notice;
(iii)  a notice of intent to file notice of final completion;
(iv)  a notice for remaining amounts due to complete the contract;
(v)  a notice of completion;
(vi)  a request for notice;
(vii)  providing a required notice by an alternate method of delivery;
(viii)  a duplicate receipt of a filing; and
(ix)  account setup for a person who wishes to be billed periodically for
filings with the database.
(b)  The fees allowed under Subsection (4)(a) may not exceed the amount
reasonably necessary to create and maintain the database.
(c)  The fees established by the division may vary by method of filing if one
form of filing is more costly to process than another form of filing.
(d)  The division may provide by contract that the designated agent may retain
all fees collected by the designated agent except that the designated agent
shall remit to the division the cost of the division's oversight under
Subsection (2)(b).
(5) (a)  The database is classified as a public record under Title 63G,
Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, unless otherwise
classified by the division.
(b)  A request for information submitted to the designated agent is not
subject to Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
(c)  Information contained in a public record contained in the database shall
be requested from the designated agent.
(d)  The designated agent may charge a commercially reasonable fee allowed by
the designated agent's contract with the division for providing information
under Subsection (5)(c).
(e)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act, if information is available in a public record contained in
the database, a person may not request the information from the division.
(f) (i)  A person may request information that is not a public record
contained in the database from the division in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
(ii)  The division shall inform the designated agent of how to direct
inquiries made to the designated agent for information that is not a public
record contained in the database.
(6)  The following are not an adjudicative proceeding under Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act:
(a)  the filing of a notice permitted by this chapter;
(b)  the rejection of a filing permitted by this chapter; or
(c)  other action by the designated agent in connection with a filing of any
notice permitted by this chapter.
(7)  The division and the designated agent need not determine the timeliness
of any notice before filing the notice in the database.
(8) (a)  A person who is delinquent on the payment of a fee established under
Subsection (4) may not file a notice with the database.
(b)  A determination that a person is delinquent on the payment of a fee for
filing established under Subsection (4) shall be made in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(c)  Any order issued in a proceeding described in Subsection (8)(b) may
prescribe the method of that person's payment of fees for filing notices with
the database after issuance of the order.
(9)  If a notice is filed by a third party on behalf of another, the notice is
considered to be filed by the person on whose behalf the notice is filed.
(10)  A person filing a notice of commencement, preliminary notice, or notice
of completion is responsible for verifying the accuracy of information entered
into the database, whether the person files electronically or by alternate or
third party filing.
